New York, session 2025-2026, A1023.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 2803-c of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph s to read as follows: 3 s. Pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner, every 4 patient of a nursing home, hospital or facility providing health related 5 services, shall have the right to video communication devices for use 6 when visitor access is limited, including, but not limited to during flu 7 season or during a designated state of emergency or a state disaster 8 emergency. 9 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 23-b of the executive law is amended by 10 adding a new paragraph (e) to read as follows: 11 (e) Providing video communication devices for use when visitor access 12 is limited, including, but not limited to during a designated state of 13 emergency or a state disaster emergency. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 16 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 17 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 18 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00269-01-5